New York, session 2025-2026, A10461.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 23 of paragraph (i) of subdivision b of 2 section 6-116.2 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as 3 added by local law number 49 of the city of New York for the year 1992, 4 is amended and a new subparagraph 24 is added to read as follows: 5 (23) the name and main business address of anyone who the contractor 6 retained, employed or designated to influence the preparation of 7 contract specifications or the solicitation or award of this 8 contract[.]; and 9 (24) a statement indicating any personal or professional relationship 10 the principal owners and officers of the contractor or subcontractor has 11 to any public servants who formed or assisted in the formation of a 12 contract with such principal owners and officers of the contractor or 13 subcontractor. Further, such statement shall include a sworn declaration 14 that such contract is in compliance with the provisions of chapter 15 sixty-eight of the New York city charter. For the purposes of this 16 subparagraph, the term "public servant" shall have the same meaning as 17 such term is defined in section twenty-six hundred one of the New York 18 city charter. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15040-01-6